Massachusetts, session 194th, S1810.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Subdivision (2) of section 6 of chapter 32 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022
Official Edition, is hereby amended by inserting the following new paragraph: -
(e) Upon acceptance of this paragraph by a retirement system, payments to a member
retired under the provisions of this section shall be no less than the monthly payment to a
disabled individual, with the same marital status, under the state supplemental security income
program. Acceptance of this paragraph shall be by a majority vote of the board of each such
system, subject to the approval of the legislative body. For the purposes herein, “legislative
body” shall mean, in the case of a city, the city council in accordance with its charter, in the case
of a town, the town meeting, in the case of a county, the county retirement board advisory
council, in the case of a region, the regional retirement board advisory council, in the case of a
of 2

district, the district members, and, in the case of an authority, the governing body. Acceptance
shall be deemed to have occurred upon the filing of a certification of such votes with the
commission. For purposes herein, the state teachers’ and state employees’ retirement systems
shall be deemed to have accepted this paragraph.
of 2